Hawaii statutes.
§291-57
Parking spaces reserved for persons with disabilities; penalties. (a) Any person who uses a parking space reserved
for persons with disabilities who:

(1) Fails to
properly display a removable windshield placard, a temporary removable
windshield placard, or special license plates;

(2) Displays an
invalid removable windshield placard, an invalid temporary removable windshield
placard, or invalid special license plates;

(3) Uses a
removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield placard, or
special license plate that was not issued to that person or to any passengers
occupying the vehicle in the parking space; or

(4) With or
without a removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield
placard, or special license plates:

(A) Parks in an
access aisle; or

(B) Obstructs the
ingress or egress to a parking space reserved for a person with a disability;

shall be guilty
of a traffic infraction under chapter 291D and shall be fined not less than
$250 nor more than $500 and pay any costs incurred by the court related to
assessing the fine; provided that a person with a disability who has been
issued a valid placard or special license plate that is currently in effect,
and who has failed to display the placard or license plate while parking in a
space reserved for persons with disabilities, shall pay a fine of not less than
$25 nor more than $100 and any costs incurred by the court related to assessing
the fine.

(b) Any
person who uses a parking space reserved for persons with disabilities and
refuses or fails to present an identification card issued under this chapter or
the rules adopted thereunder to an enforcement officer upon request shall be
guilty of a traffic infraction under chapter 291D and shall be fined not less
than $250 nor more than $500.

(c) Any
citation issued under this chapter may be mailed to the violator pursuant to
section 291C-165(b). [L 1997, c 308, §2; am L 2001, c 297, §11; am L
2003, c 30, §10]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next